Hawaii, session 2025, GM1361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Chapter 269, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new sections to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§269-A Electric cooperative cost recovery for wildfire
mitigation, repair, and restoration costs. (a) An electric
cooperative may recover commission-approved wildfire mitigation,
repair, and restoration costs through an automatic rate
adjustment clause or other tariff recovery mechanism to be
established by the commission.
(b) For purposes of this section, "electric cooperative"
means a public utility that satisfies the requirements under
section 269-31(c).
§269-B Determination of limitation on liability. (a) The
commission shall initiate a proceeding for the adoption of rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to establish the maximum amount each
electric utility may pay to resolve claims arising from any
SB897 GDI LRB 25-1835.docx
Riiiniiisiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiti

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
covered catastrophic wildfires, as defined in section 663- ,
for set periods of time established by rules in accordance with
this section. The commission shall have sole discretion to
establish the maximum payable amounts and applicable periods of
time. The rules adopted by the commission under this section
shall have the force and effect of law.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules as soon as is
practicable. The rules shall authorize the maximum payable
amount each electric utility may pay to resolve qualifying
damages arising from any covered catastrophic wildfires, as
those terms are defined in section 663- , that occur within a
set period of time, or per event, as determined by the
commission, without harming ratepayers or materially impacting
each electric utility's ability to provide adequate and safe
service consistent with the public interest. In adopting rules
to establish the maximum payable amount, the commission shall
consider, at a minimum;
(1) Whether the maximum payable amount shall be delineated
by the qualifying damages arising from covered
catastrophic wildfires that occur:
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 2
■IllllllllllllliilllWIII

Page 3 S.B. NO. SS.3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(A) Within a set period of time that is determined by
the commission; or
(B) Per event;
(2) Different approaches to establishing the maximum
payable amount^ such as a flat dollar limit for the
set period of time, or per event; one based upon a
percentage of the electric utility's market
capitalization or rate base; or hybrid approaches,
including examining frameworks adopted or considered
in other wildfire-prone states and their
effectiveness;
(3) Impacts on the electric utility's credit ratings,
borrowing costs, and customer's electricity rates, and
how the establishment of the maximum payable amount
will help to achieve intended outcomes of improving
the utility's credit rating and lowering costs passed
on to customers;
(4) Impacts of the maximum payable amount upon the
insurance market in the State;
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 3
Hiiimiinmiiiiwiinnii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
^-3
C.D. 1
(5) Impacts of the maximum payable amount on the
indemnity, contribution, and subrogation rights of any
person or entity;
(6) Impacts on the liability exposure of other
hypothetical future co-defendants with respect to
claims arising from a catastrophic wildfire;
(7) Impacts on potential future plaintiffs who could be
negatively impacted by the establishment of the
maximum payable amount;
(8) The affordability of electric utility service and the
potential impacts on customer’s electricity rates by
the establishment of the maximum payable amount;
(9) Requirements to maintain or improve the quality of
service to the electric utility's customers;
(10) Requirements to improve the management of the electric
utility doing business in the State;
(11) Requirements to meet state policy goals for clean
energy and climate;
(12) Requirements to implement wildfire mitigation plans
and improve safety;
SB897 GDI LRB 25-1835.docx
MiHiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiHm

S.B. NO.
’^3
• H.D, 2
C.D. 1
(13) Requirements to improve interconnection costs and
timeliness; and
(14) Th^restriction or r^ductd;^n of com£ensa tion£acka2^
and bonuses to officers and employees of the electric
utility.
(c) The rules adopted pursuant to this section shall also
include;
(1) Conditions to ensure that the establishment of the
maximum payable amount is consistent with the public
interest;
(2) Annual reporting requirements for compliance with any
conditions established; and
(3) Procedures for corrective actions if the electric
utility is not in compliance.
Rules required to be adopted under this section shall be adopted
in a single rulemaking proceeding. Upon request by the
commission, the electric utility or any state or county agency
shall provide any information that is relevant to the rulemaking
proceedings under this section.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
rules adopted under this section shall be presented to, and
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
IMIIimiHMIilHIl

Pages S.B. NO. 3^ 3
C.D. 1
subject to the approval of, the governor. If the governor
approves the rules, the governor shall sign the rules, and the
rules shall be adopted as provided in section 91-3. If the
governor does not approve the rules, the governor may return the
rules to the commission with the governor's reasons for
disapproval. The governor shall have twenty-one days to
consider the rules after the rules are presented to the
governor, and if the rules are neither signed nor returned by
the governor within that time, the rules shall be adopted as if
the governor had signed them.
If the rules are returned to the commission, the commission
may start anew the rule-making process set forth in subsection
(b) .
(e) On or before the last day of the preceding set period
of time established by the commission with respect to each
electric utility, the commission shall adopt rules pursuant to
subsection (b) and (c) for the next subsequent proposed period
of time.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
supreme court shall have original jurisdiction over any petition
to obtain a judicial determination as to the validity of the
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
■OllillllllHVMIIIIilH

Page 7 897
S.B. NO
S.D. 3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
rules adopted under this section. The petition shall be filed
with the clerk of the supreme court within thirty days of the
filing of the rules with the lieutenant governor pursuant to
section 91-4(b). After an action is filed pursuant to this
paragraph, the supreme court shall give priority to the action
over all other civil or administrative appeals or matters and
shall render a final judgment and opinion as expeditiously as
possible. No action challenging the validity of the rules may
be brought except as provided in this subsection.
In all collateral proceedings, including any civil action
to recover damages for a covered catastrophic wildfire, the
maximum payable amounts established by the rules shall be
conclusive and not subject to judicial review. Nothing in this
section or rules adopted under this section shall be construed
to create any property interest or entitlement of any kind in
the electric utility, and no claim by any party, whether
sounding in law or equity, or under article I, section 20, of
the Hawaii State Constitution, may be brought against the
commission, its commissioners, officials, and employees, or the
State relating to rulemaking under this section.
(g) For purposes of this section:
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
■niiiMniiMiiHWi

Pages
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
’’Electric utility" includes ’ an electric cooperative^ as
defined in section 269-A(b).
"Wildfire mitigation plan" means the plan that each
electric utility shall file with the commission, and which shall
be periodically updated at a frequency determined by the
commission, that sets forth the utility’s practices to protect
public safety and reduce risk to customers from wildfires and to
promote the resilience of the electric system to wildfire
damage, pursuant to requirements established by the commission."
SECTION 2. Chapter 663, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
’’§663- Limitation on aggregate liability; electric
utilities. (a) The aggregate liability of an electric utility,
including its affiliates, collectively, for qualifying damages
arising from a covered catastrophic wildfire shall not exceed
the least of the maximum payable amount authorized by the rules,
adopted pursuant to section 269-B, for either the set period of
time in which the covered catastrophic wildfire began or per
event, as determined by the commission, or for the remainder of
the maximum payable amount to the extent that the electric
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
illHIiWinilHMIiHllli

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
utility has already paid qualifying damages for the same time
period or event.
(b) An electric utility that seeks to assert the
limitation on aggregate liability set forth in subsection (a)
shall;
(1) Have a wildfire mitigation plan, as defined in section
269-B, that is approved by the commission and shall
have sought and received a determination from the
commission that the plan is being implemented on the
timeline approved by the commission; and
(2) Be in full compliance with any conditions and
reporting requirements established by rule pursuant to
subsection 269-B(c).
(c) All civil actions arising out of a catastrophic
wildfire shall be brought in the circuit in which the
catastrophic wildfire occurred. The court shall adopt
procedures to equitably apply the limit set forth in
subsection (a) to all filed civil claims, and notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, joint and several liability shall not
apply to qualifying damages, even as to any amount of qualifying
damages in excess of the aggregate liability of an electric
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
illllMHIDIIinillillll

Page 10
S.B. NO. S.3
C.D. 1
utility; provided that in any action to recover from a person or
an entity in connection with a covered catastrophic wildfire,
the person or entity may claim, in defense, apportionment of
fault to any other person, entity, electric utility, or electric
cooperative, even as to those who are not a party to the action.
The exceptions to the abolition of joint and several liability
set forth in section 663-10.9 shall not apply to any suit,
claim, arbitration, or other civil action arising out of a
covered catastrophic wildfire. All settlements or judgments for
claims for qualifying damages shall be subject to approval by
the court. The court shall not approve any settlement or
judgment that would cause the aggregate liability of electric
utilities to exceed the aggregate liability limit prescribed by
the commission if the utility is entitled to invoke the
limitation under subsection (a). No liability allocable to the
electric utility that is not payable because of the aggregate
liability limit shall be shifted, in any manner, to any other
alleged tortfeasor or obligor.
(d) A court may consolidate cases arising from a covered
catastrophic wildfire. Any circuit court that is not the
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 10
■liiiniiiiiiiNiRiiin

Page 11
S.B. NO. S.,
H.D.2
C.D. 1
consolidating court shall transfer any civil case to facilitate
the consolidation.
(e) No later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session, the commission shall study and submit a
report to the legislature that includes;
(1) An assessment of whether the factors considered
pursuant to section 269-B(b) adequately balance the
solvency interests of electric utilities with the
compensation owed in the previous year to catastrophic
wildfire victims, or whether additional factors should
be considered; and
(2) Any other findings and recommendations, including any
necessary proposed legislation.
(f) For the purposes of this section;
"Catastrophic wildfire” means a wildfire occurring in the
State on or after the effective date of this Act that
substantially damages or destroys more than five hundred
commercial structures or residential structures designed for
habitation or, for an electric cooperative, a wildfire that
substantially damages or destroys more than fifty commercial
structures or residential structures designed for habitation.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 1
HRniMimilllNHI

S
Page 12 i
S B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Covered catastrophic wildfire" means a catastrophic
wildfire that may have been caused, or whose severity may have
been increased, by an electric utility's facilities or actions.
"Electric utility" means a public utility that exists for
the furnishing of electrical power, including an electric
cooperative.
"Electric cooperative" is an electric utility that has the
same meaning as in section 269-31(c).
"Public utility" has the same meaning as in section 269-1.
"Qualifying damages" means economic damages arising out of
the loss of or damage to real or personal property from a
covered catastrophic wildfire. "Qualifying damages" does not
include claims for physical bodily harm or emotional harm."
PART II
SECTION 3. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read
as follows:
"CHAPTER
SECURITIZATION
§ -1 Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the
context otherwise requires:
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 12
wMiHniiiimiuiiii

Page 13
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Ancillary agreement" means a bond insurance policy, letter
of credit, reserve account, surety bond, swap arrangement,
hedging arrangement, liquidity or credit support arrangement, or
other similar agreement or arrangement entered into in
connection with the issuance of bonds that is designed to
promote the credit quality and marketability of the bonds or to
mitigate the risk of an increase in interest rates.
"Assignee" means a legally recognized entity to which an
electric utility assigns, sells, or transfers, other than as
security, all or a portion of the electric utility's interest in
or right to infrastructure resilience property. "Assignee"
includes a corporation, limited liability company, general
partnership or limited partnership, public authority, trust,
financing entity, or any other legal entity to which an assignee
assigns, sells, or transfers, other than as security, its
interest in or right to infrastructure resilience property.
"Bond" means any bond, note, certificate of participation
or beneficial interest, or other evidence of indebtedness or
ownership that is issued by the financing entity under a
financing order, the proceeds of which are used directly or
indirectly to recover, finance, or refinance financing costs of
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 13
iiiniiiiiiMHiMiiviliiiin

Page 14 S.B. NO. IS.

C.D. 1
any infrastructure resilience costs, and that are directly or
indirectly secured by or payable from infrastructure resilience
property.
"Commission" means the public utilities commission.
"Consumer" means any individual, governmental body, trust,
business entity, or nonprofit organization that consumes
electricity that has been transmitted or distributed by means of
electric transmission or distribution facilities, whether those
electric transmission or distribution facilities are owned by
the consumer, the electric utility, or any other party.
"Electric utility" means a public utility that exists for
the furnishing of electrical power.
"Executive officer" means any person who performs policy
making functions and is employed by an electric utility subject
to the approval of the board of directors, and includes the
president, secretary, treasurer, and any vice president in
charge of a principal business unit, division, or function of
the electric utility.
"Financing costs" means the costs to issue, service, repay,
or refinance bonds, whether incurred or paid upon issuance of
the bonds or over the life of the bonds, if they are approved
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx ]
■■HigilMHIIIM

° S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
for recovery by the commission in a financing order. "Financing
costs" may include any of the following:
(1) Principal, interest, and redemption premiums that are
payable on bonds;
(2) A payment required under an ancillary agreement;
(3) An amount required to fund or replenish reserve
accounts or other accounts established under an
indenture, ancillary agreement, or other financing
document related to the bonds;
(4) Taxes, franchise fees, or license fees imposed on a
financing entity as a result of the issuance of the
financing order; the assignment, sale, or transfer of
any infrastructure resilience property; or the sale of
the bonds, or imposed on the infrastructure resilience
charges, or otherwise resulting from the collection of
the infrastructure resilience charge, in any such case
whether paid, payable, or accrued;
(5) Costs related to issuing and servicing bonds or the
application for a financing order, including without
limitation servicing fees and expenses, trustee fees
and expenses, legal fees and expenses, accounting
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
nillHIIIIIIHIIIHIIHII

Page 16
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
fees, administrative fees, underwriting and placement
fees, financial advisory fees, original issue
discount, capitalized interest, rating agency fees,
and any other related costs that are approved for
recovery in the financing order;
(6) Costs related to the engagement of services of a
financial advisor by the commission; and
(7) Other costs as specifically authorized by a financing
order.
"Financing entity" means an electric utility or an entity
to which an electric utility or an affiliate of an electric
utility sells, assigns, or pledges all or a portion of the
electric utility's interest in infrastructure resilience
property, including an affiliate of the electric utility or any
unaffiliated entity, in each case as approved by the commission
in a financing order.
Subject to section -6(c), an entity to which an electric
utility sells, assigns, or pledges all or a portion of the
electric utility's interest in infrastructure resilience
property may include any governmental entity that is able to
issue bonds that are exempt from federal tax pursuant to
SB897 GDI LRB 25-1835.docx 1
MnigniMiiiiHiiii

Page 17 S.B. NO.
^-3
CD. 1
section 103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
including the State or a political subdivision thereof or any
department, agency, or instrumentality of the State or political
subdivision; provided that the bonds issued shall not constitute
a general obligation of the State or any political subdivision
thereof or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the
State or political subdivision and shall not constitute a pledge
of the full faith and credit of the entity or of the State or
any political subdivision thereof, but shall be payable solely
from the funds provided under this chapter.
"Financing order" means an order of the commission under
this chapter that has become final and no longer subject to
appeal as provided by law and that authorizes the issuance of
bonds and the imposition, adjustment from time to time, and
collection of infrastructure resilience charges, and that shall
include a procedure to require the expeditious approval by the
commission of periodic adjustments to infrastructure resilience
charges and to any associated fixed recovery tax amounts
included in that financing order to ensure recovery of all
infrastructure resilience costs and the costs associated with
the proposed recovery, financing, or refinancing thereof,
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx ]
MiiDiiiiiiniiiiiiiiii

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
including the costs of servicing and retiring the bonds
contemplated by the financing order.
"Financing party" means any holder of the bonds; any party
to or beneficiary of an ancillary agreement; and any trustee,
collateral agent, or other person acting for the benefit of any
of the foregoing.
"Fixed recovery tax amounts" means those nonbypassable
rates and other charges, including but not limited to
distribution, connection, disconnection, and termination rates
and charges, that are needed to recover federal and state taxes
associated with infrastructure resilience charges authorized by
the commission in a financing order, but are not approved as
financing costs financed from proceeds of bonds.
"Infrastructure resilience charges" means the nonbypassable
charges, including but not limited to distribution, connection,
disconnection, and termination rates and charges, that are
authorized in a financing order authorized under this chapter to
be imposed on and collected from all existing and future
consumers of an electric utility or any successor to recover
principal, interest, and other financing costs relating to the
bonds issued by its financing entity.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 1
illllHnilHMHIlinilM

Page 19 S.B. NO.
^^3
CD. 1
"Infrastructure resilience costs" means an electric
utility's costs to implement its wildfire risk mitigation plan
and other investments in infrastructure improvements,
modernization, and replacement needed to reduce wildfire risks
and increase reliability and resilience to natural disasters and
weather-related events, as approved by the commission.
"Infrastructure resilience property" means the property
right created pursuant to this chapter, including but not
limited to the right, title, and interest of an electric
utility, financing entity, or its assignee:
(1) In and to the infrastructure resilience charge
established pursuant to a financing order, including
the right to impose, bill, collect, and receive the
infrastructure resilience charges under the financing
order and all rights to obtain adjustments to the
infrastructure resilience charge in accordance with
section -3 and the financing order; and
(2) To be paid the amount that is determined in a
financing order to be the amount that the electric
utility or its assignee is lawfully entitled to
receive pursuant to this chapter and the proceeds
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx ]
■iiMMiiiiniMinmiii

Page 20 S.B. NO.
^-3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
thereof, and in and to all revenues, collections,
claims, payments, moneys, or proceeds of, or arising
from, the infrastructure resilience charge that is the
subject of a financing order.
"Infrastructure resilience property" does not include a right to
be paid fixed recovery tax amounts. "Infrastructure resilience
property" shall constitute a current property right,
notwithstanding the fact that the value of the property right
will depend on consumers using electricity or, in those
instances where consumers are customers of the electric utility,
the electric utility performing certain services.
"Investor-owned electric utility" means an electric utility
that is owned by shareholders and overseen by a board of
directors elected by shareholders.
"Public utility" has the same meaning as in section 269-1.
"True-up adjustment" means a formulaic adjustment to the
infrastructure resilience charges as they appear on consumer
bills that is necessary to correct for any overcollection or
undercollection of the infrastructure resilience charges
authorized by a financing order and to otherwise ensure the
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 20

Page 21
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
timely and complete payment and recovery of infrastructure
resilience costs over the authorized repayment term.
"Wildfire risk mitigation plan" means a plan, which may
include a natural hazard mitigation report, in which an electric
utility addresses how the electric utility will mitigate the
risk to its equipment in the event of a wildfire.
§ -2 Applications to issue bonds and authorize
infrastructure resilience charges. (a) An electric utility may
apply to the commission for one or more financing orders to
issue bonds to recover any infrastructure resilience costs, each
of which authorizes the following:
(1) The imposition, charging, and collection of an
infrastructure resilience charge, to become effective
upon the issuance of the bonds, and an adjustment of
any such infrastructure resilience charge in
accordance with a true-up adjustment mechanism under
this chapter in amounts sufficient to pay the
principal and interest on the bonds and all other
associated financing costs on a timely basis;
(2) The creation of infrastructure resilience property
under the financing order; and
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 21
inRiMiMiiiiiMiiini

Page 22
S.B. NO.
^^3
C.D. 1
(3) The imposition, charging, and collection of fixed
recovery tax amounts to recover any portion of the
electric utility's federal and state taxes associated
with those infrastructure resilience charges and not
financed from the proceeds of bonds.
(b) The commission may issue a financing order that
authorizes the issuance of bonds under subsection (a) only if:
(1) The electric utility, in good faith, has sought the
maximum federal funding to offset the costs of
infrastructure;
(2) After the effective date of this Act, the first
$500,000,000 in infrastructure resilience capital
investments, in the aggregate, must be made under this
Act; and
(3) Any assets that are to be financed under
securitization should not already be included in the
electric utility's rate base.
(c) The application shall include all of the following:
(1) The infrastructure resilience costs to be financed
through the issuance of bonds;
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 22

Page 23
S.B. NO.
^-3
C.D. 1
(2) The principal amount of the bonds proposed to be
issued and the selection of a financing entity;
(3) An estimate of the date on which each series of bonds
is expected to be issued;
(4) The scheduled final payment date, which shall not
exceed thirty years, and a legal final maturity date,
which may be longer, subject to rating agency and
market considerations, during which term the
infrastructure resilience charge associated with the
issuance of each series of bonds is expected to be
imposed and collected;
(5) An estimate of the financing costs associated with the
issuance of each series of bonds;
(6) An estimate of the amount of the infrastructure
resilience charge revenues necessary to pay principal
and interest on the bonds and all other associated
financing costs as set forth in the application and
calculation for that estimate;
(7) A proposed design of the infrastructure resilience
charge and a proposed methodology for allocating the
infrastructure resilience charge among customer
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 23

Page 24 S.B. NO. S.3
C.D. 1
classes within the electric utility's service
territory;
(8) A description of the financing entity selected by the
electric utility;
(9) A description of a proposed true-up adjustment
mechanism for the adjustment of the infrastructure
resilience charge to correct for any overcollection or
undercollection of the infrastructure resilience
charge, and to otherwise ensure the timely payment of
principal and interest on the bonds and all other
associated financing costs; and
(10) Any other information required by the commission.
(d) An electric utility may file an application for a
financing order, or as a joint applicant with one or more
affiliate electric utilities, to issue bonds to recover
infrastructure resilience costs. The application shall include
a description of:
(1) How the infrastructure resilience charges will be
allocated among the applicant electric utilities in a
manner that is equitable and that need not correspond
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835,docx 24
iWMHimilllHIMIIII

Page 25
S.B. NO.

H.D. 2
C.D. 1
to the incurrence of infrastructure resilience costs
by each electric utility; and
(2) Whether and how the consumers of any of the applicant
electric utilities will be responsible for the payment
of infrastructure resilience charges allocated to
consumers of affiliate electric utilities.
In the alternative, an electric utility may apply for a
financing order to issue bonds to recover infrastructure
resilience costs, including infrastructure resilience costs
incurred, or to be incurred, by the applicant and one or more of
its affiliate electric utilities. In connection with the
issuance of a financing order pursuant to this subsection, the
commission shall issue a concurrent order to the affiliate
electric utility or electric utilities directing the affiliate
electric utility or electric utilities to impose rates on its or
their consumers designed to generate revenue sufficient to pay
credits over the life of the bonds to the applicant electric
utility in the amount as the commission determines is equitable,
just, and reasonable. The application shall describe the
allocation method and adjustment mechanism for the affiliate
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 25
■nnmniHttMiiM

S.B. NO. SS.,
CD. 1
electric utility credit payments proposed to be subject to the
concurrent commission order.
(e) The commission shall issue an approval or denial of
any application for a financing order filed pursuant to this
section within ninety days of the last filing in the applicable
docket.
(f) In exercising its duties under this section, the
commission shall consider:
(1) Whether the issuance of the bonds, and the imposition
and collection of infrastructure resilience charges,
are consistent with the public interest;
(2) Whether the structuring, marketing, and pricing of the
bonds are expected to result in the lowest
infrastructure resilience charges consistent with
market conditions at the time at which the bonds are
priced and the terms of the financing order;
(3) Whether the terms and conditions of any bonds to be
issued are just and reasonable;
(4) With respect to an application by an investor-owned
electric utility, whether the recovery of
infrastructure resilience costs through the
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 2
HIIMIiniHllliiM

Page 27 897
S.B. NO.
S.D. 3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
designation of the infrastructure resilience charges
and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts, and the
issuance of bonds in connection with the
infrastructure resilience charges, would result in net
savings or mitigate rate impacts to consumers, as
compared to rate recovery without securitization; and
(5) Any other factors that the commission deems reasonable
and in the public interest.
If the commission makes the determination specified in this
section, the commission shall establish, as part of the
financing order, a procedure for the electric utility to submit
applications from time to time to request the issuance of
additional financing orders designating infrastructure
resilience charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts
as recoverable.
An electric utility may include in its application for a
financing order a request for authorization to sell, transfer,
assign, or pledge infrastructure resilience property to a
governmental entity if the electric utility expects bonds issued
by a governmental entity to result in a more cost-efficient
means, taking into account all financing costs related to the
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 2
■Hiimiiniiiin

Page 28 897
S.B. NO.
S.D. 3
H.D.2
C.D. 1
bonds, than using another financing entity to issue bonds to
finance the same infrastructure resilience costs, taking into
account the costs of issuing the other financing entity's bonds.
(g) Infrastructure resilience charges and any associated
fixed recovery tax amounts shall be imposed only on existing and
future consumers in the utility service territory of the
electric utility that is subject to such financing order.
Consumers within the utility service territory of the electric
utility that are subject to the financing order shall continue
to pay infrastructure resilience charges and any associated
fixed recovery tax amounts until the bonds and associated
financing costs are paid in full by the financing entity.
§ -3 Infrastructure resilience financing order. (a) A
financing order shall remain in effect until the bonds issued
under the financing order and all financing costs related to the
bonds have been paid in full or defeased by their terms. The
aggregate of the financing orders shall be for no greater than
$500,000,000 of the infrastructure resilience costs for a
corporate family of the electric utility.
A financing order shall remain in effect and unabated
notwithstanding the bankruptcy, reorganization, or insolvency of
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 28
■niinii«iiiiHi

S.B. NO.
^-3
C.D. 1
the electric utility or the commencement of any judicial or
nonjudicial proceeding on the financing order.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, with
respect to infrastructure resilience property that has been made
the basis for the issuance of bonds and with respect to any
associated fixed recovery tax amounts, the financing order, the
infrastructure resilience charges, and any associated fixed
recovery tax amounts shall be irrevocable. The State and its
agencies, including the commission, pledge and agree with
bondholders, the owners and assignees of the infrastructure
resilience property, and other financing parties that the State
and its agencies shall not take any action listed in this
subsection. This subsection shall not preclude an action if the
action would not adversely affect the interests of the electric
utility, of assignees of the infrastructure resilience property,
and of bondholders. The prohibited actions shall be the
following:
(1) Alter the provisions of this chapter, which authorize
the commission to create an irrevocable contract right
or choose in action by the issuance of a financing
order, to create infrastructure resilience property
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 2
MimMHiiiffliiigHni

Page 30
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
and make the infrastructure resilience charges imposed
by a financing order irrevocable, binding,
nonbypassable charges for all existing and future
consumers;
(2) Take or permit any action that impairs or would impair
the value of infrastructure resilience property or the
security for the bonds or revise the infrastructure
resilience costs for which recovery is authorized;
(3) In any way impair the rights and remedies of the
bondholders, assignees, and other financing parties;
and
(4) Except for changes made pursuant to the true-up
adjustment authorized under subsection (d), reduce,
alter, or impair infrastructure resilience charges
IS that are to be imposed, billed, charged, collected,
and remitted for the benefit of the bondholders, any
assignee, and any other financing parties until any
and all principal, interest, premium, financing costs,
and other fees, expenses, or charges incurred, and any
contracts to be performed, in connection with the
related bonds have been paid and performed in full.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 3
■niiiHiiiiMnniiiiiiinH

S.B. NO. S.,
- H.D. 2
C.D. 1
The financing entity may include this pledge in the bonds.
(c) Under a financing order, the electric utility shall
retain sole discretion to select the financing entity and to
cause bonds to be issued, including the right to defer or
postpone the issuance, assignment, sale, or transfer of
infrastructure resilience property.
(d) The commission may create, pursuant to an application
from an electric utility, a nonbypassable charge referred to as
an infrastructure resilience charge, which shall be applied to
recover principal, interest, and other financing costs relating
to the bonds. The infrastructure resilience charge shall be a
dedicated, discrete tariff rider.
The commission, in any financing order, shall establish a
procedure for periodic true-up adjustments to infrastructure
resilience charges, which shall be made at least annually and
may be made more frequently. Within thirty days after receiving
an electric utility's filing of a true-up adjustment, the
commission's review of the filing shall be limited to
mathematical or clerical errors as determined in accordance with
any true-up adjustment formulas set forth in the applicable
financing order.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 3
iniHiHiiiiiniHMiiiiiiii

Page 32
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The commission shall either approve the filing or inform
the electric utility of any mathematical or clerical errors in
its calculation. If the commission informs the electric utility
of mathematical or clerical errors in its calculation, the
electric utility shall correct its error and refile its true-up
adjustment. The timeframes previously described in this
subsection shall apply to a refiled true-up adjustment.
(e) The commission may include in the financing order a
requirement that, if the electric utility fails to transfer the
wildfire recovery charges it has collected, the commission will
order that those funds shall be withheld and paid directly to
the applicable financing entity. Any order shall remain in full
force and effect notwithstanding any bankruptcy, reorganization,
or other insolvency proceedings with respect to the electric
utility.
(f) Neither financing orders nor bonds issued under this
chapter shall constitute a general obligation of the State or
any of its political subdivisions, nor shall they constitute a
pledge of the full faith and credit of the State or any of its
political subdivisions, but shall be payable solely from the
infrastructure resilience property provided under this chapter.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx ;
HIIIIIHliiHMIIIIimili

Page 33 O n K I
S.B. NO.
S.D.3
C.D. 1
All bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to
the following effect: "Neither the full faith and credit nor
the taxing power of the State of Hawaii is pledged to the
payment of the principal of, or interest and premium on, this
bond."
The issuance of bonds under this chapter shall not
directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the State or any
of its political subdivisions to levy or pledge any form of
taxation or make any appropriation for their payment.
(g) Infrastructure resilience charges are infrastructure
resilience property when, and to the extent that, a financing
order authorizing the infrastructure resilience charges has
become effective in accordance with this chapter, and the
infrastructure resilience property shall thereafter continuously
exist as property for all purposes, and all of the rights and
privileges relating to that property shall continuously exist
for the period and to the extent provided in the financing
order, but in any event until the bonds, including all
principal; premiums, if any; interest with respect to the bonds;
and all other financing costs are paid in full. A financing
order may provide that the creation of infrastructure resilience
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 3
mMinimHiniiHii

Page 34 S.B. NO.
3^3
C.D. 1
property shall be simultaneous with the sale of the
infrastructure resilience property to an assignee as provided in
the application of the pledge of the infrastructure resilience
property to secure the bonds.
(h) Any successor to a financing entity shall be bound by
the requirements of this chapter and shall perform and satisfy
all obligations of and have the same rights under a financing
order as, and to the same extent as, the financing entity.
(i) No electric utility approved for a financing order
shall increase compensation for its executive officers unless
the utility's wildfire risk mitigation plan compliance reports
have been approved by the commission for five consecutive years;
provided that the commission may consider an alternative
symmetric performance incentive mechanism, if the commission
deems appropriate. For the purposes of this subsection,
"wildfire risk mitigation plan" has the same meaning as in
section -1.
(j) As used in this section, "corporate family" means a
group of corporations consisting of a parent corporation and all
subsidiaries in which the parent corporation owns directly or
indirectly a controlling interest.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 3
IMigiHIHIillllllllH

Page 35
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(k) The commission, in its discretion, may engage the
services of a financial adviser for the purposes of assisting
the commission in its consideration of an application for a
financing order and a subsequent issuance of bonds pursuant to a
financing order.
§ -4 Bonds; issuance; infrastructure resilience property
interests. (a) The electric utility may sell and assign all or
portions of its interest in infrastructure resilience property
to one or more financing entities that make that infrastructure
resilience property the basis for issuance of bonds, to the
extent approved in a financing order. The electric utility or
financing entity may pledge infrastructure resilience property
as collateral, directly or indirectly, for bonds to the extent
approved in the pertinent financing orders providing for a
security interest in the infrastructure resilience property, in
the manner set forth in this section. In addition,
infrastructure resilience property may be sold or assigned by
either of the following:
(1) The financing entity or a trustee for the holders of
bonds or the holders of an ancillary agreement in
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx

Page 36
S.B. NO.
C.D, 1
connection with the exercise of remedies upon a
default under the terms of the bonds; or
(2) Any person acquiring the infrastructure resilience
property after a sale or assignment pursuant to this
chapter.
(b) To the extent that any interest in infrastructure
resilience property is sold, assigned, or is pledged as
collateral pursuant to subsection (a), the commission shall
require the electric utility to contract with the financing
entity or its assignees that the electric utility will:
(1) Continue to operate its system to provide service to
consumers within its service territory;
(2) Collect amounts in respect of the infrastructure
resilience charges for the benefit and account of the
financing entity or its assignees; and
(3) Account for and remit these amounts to or for the
account of the financing entity or its assignees.
Contracting with the financing entity or its assignees in
accordance with that authorization shall not impair or negate
the characterization of the sale, assignment, or pledge as an
absolute transfer, a true sale, or a security interest, as
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 36
nillHiHMiniiNH

Page 37
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
applicable. To the extent that billing, collection, and other
related services with respect to the provision of the electric
utility's services are provided to a consumer by any person or
entity other than the electric utility in whose service
territory the consumer is located, that person or entity shall
collect the infrastructure resilience charges and any associated
fixed recovery tax amounts from the consumer for the benefit and
account of the electric utility, financing entity, or assignees
with the associated revenues remitted solely for the person's
benefit as a condition to the provision of electric utility
service to that consumer.
Each financing order shall impose terms and conditions,
consistent with the purposes and objectives of this chapter, on
any person or entity responsible for billing, collection, and
other related services, including but not limited to collection
of the infrastructure resilience charges and any associated
fixed recovery tax amounts, that are the subject of the
financing order.
(c) The financing entity may issue bonds upon approval by
the commission in a financing order. Bonds shall be nonrecourse
to the credit or any assets of the electric utility, other than
SB897 GDI LRB 25-1835.docx 3
niHiHiimiiiiHi

Page 38
S.B. NO.

C.D. 1
the infrastructure resilience property as specified in that
financing order.
(d) Infrastructure resilience property that is specified
in a financing order shall constitute an existing, present
property right, notwithstanding the fact that the imposition and
collection of infrastructure resilience charges depend on the
electric utility's continuing to provide services or continuing
to perform its servicing functions relating to the collection of
infrastructure resilience charges or on the level of future
service consumption, such as consumption of an electric utility
service. Infrastructure resilience property shall exist whether
or not the infrastructure resilience charges have been billed,
have accrued, or have been collected, and notwithstanding the
fact that the value for a security interest in the
infrastructure resilience property, or amount of the
infrastructure resilience property, is dependent on the future
provision of service to consumers. All infrastructure
resilience property specified in a financing order shall
continue to exist until the bonds issued pursuant to a financing
order and all associated financing costs are paid in full.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx

■loimiiminmiinii

Page 39
S.B. NO. S.3
C.D. 1
(e) Infrastructure resilience property; infrastructure
resilience charges; and the interests of an assignee,
bondholder, or financing entity, or any pledgee in
infrastructure resilience property and infrastructure resilience
charges shall not be subject to setoff, counterclaim, surcharge,
recoupment, or defense by the electric utility or any other
person or in connection with the bankruptcy, reorganization, or
other insolvency proceeding of the electric utility, any
affiliate of the electric utility, or any other entity.
(f) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any
requirement under this chapter or a financing order that the
commission acts upon shall be binding upon the commission, as it
may be constituted from time to time, and any successor agency
exercising functions similar to the commission, and the
commission shall have no authority to rescind, alter, or amend
that requirement in a financing order.
§ -5 Infrastructure resilience charge. (a) The
infrastructure resilience charge created pursuant to a financing
order approved pursuant to section -2 shall be a
nonbypassable charge of a financing entity that shall be applied
to the repayment of bonds and related financing costs as
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 3
■MHiimiHiwnwii

Page 40
S.B. NO.
^.3
C.D. 1
described in this chapter. The infrastructure resilience charge
and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts may be a
usage-based charge, a flat user charge, or a charge based upon
customer revenues as determined by the commission for each
consumer class in any financing order.
(b) As long as any bonds are outstanding and any financing
costs have not been paid in full, any infrastructure resilience
charge and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts authorized
under a financing order shall be nonbypassable. Subject to any
exceptions provided in a financing order, an infrastructure
resilience charge and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts
shall be paid by all existing and future consumers within the
utility service territory.
(c) The infrastructure resilience charge shall be
collected by an electric utility or its successors, in
accordance with section -8(a), in full through a charge that
is separate and apart from the electric utility's rates. The
infrastructure resilience charge shall be collected by the
public utilities or their successors as collection agents for
the applicable financing entity, and such amounts shall be held
in trust until transferred to the applicable financing entity.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 40
■iMMMmnnniiiiiii

Page 41 897
S.B. NO
S.D. 3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(d) An electric utility may exercise the same rights and
remedies under its tariff and applicable law and regulation
based on a consumer's nonpayment of the infrastructure
resilience charge as it could for a consumer's failure to pay
any other charge payable to that electric utility.
§ -6 Security Interests In Infrastructure resilience
property/ financing statements. (a) A security interest in
infrastructure resilience property is valid and enforceable
against the pledgor and third parties, subject to the rights of
any third parties holding security interests in the
infrastructure resilience property perfected in the manner
described in this section, and attaches when all of the
following have occurred:
(1) The commission has issued a financing order
authorizing the infrastructure resilience charge to be
included in the infrastructure resilience property;
(2) Value has been given by the pledgees of the
infrastructure resilience property; and
(3) The pledgor has signed a security agreement covering
the infrastructure resilience property.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
iMMHHHnVIMHIiili

Page 42
S.B. NO.
“3
C.D. 1
(b) A valid and enforceable security interest in
infrastructure resilience property is perfected when it has
attached and when a financing statement has been filed with the
bureau of conveyances naming the pledgor of the infrastructure
resilience property as "debtor" and identifying the
infrastructure resilience property.
Any description of the infrastructure resilience property
shall be sufficient if it refers to the financing order creating
the infrastructure resilience property. A copy of the financing
statement shall be filed with the commission by the electric
utility that is the pledgor or transferor of the infrastructure
resilience property. The commission may require the electric
utility to make other filings with respect to the security
interest in accordance with procedures that the commission may
establish; provided that the filings shall not affect the
perfection of the security interest.
(c) A perfected security interest in infrastructure
resilience property shall be a continuously perfected security
interest in all infrastructure resilience property revenues and
proceeds arising with respect thereto, whether or not the
revenues or proceeds have accrued. Conflicting security
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 42
■■■innHiwiiiiii

Page 43 S.B. NO. S.,
C.D. 1
interests shall rank according to priority in time of
perfection. Infrastructure resilience property shall constitute
property for all purposes, including for contracts securing
bonds, whether or not the infrastructure resilience property
revenues and proceeds have accrued.
(d) Subject to the terms of the security agreement
covering the infrastructure resilience property and the rights
of any third parties holding security interests in the
infrastructure resilience property, perfected in the manner
described in this section, the validity and relative priority of
a security interest created under this section shall not be
defeated or adversely affected by the commingling of revenues
arising with respect to the infrastructure resilience property
with other funds of the electric utility that is the pledgor or
transferor of the infrastructure resilience property, or by any
security interest in a deposit account of that electric utility
perfected under article 9 of chapter 490, into which the
revenues are deposited.
Subject to the terms of the security agreement, upon
compliance with the requirements of section 490:9-312(b)(1), the
pledgees of the infrastructure resilience property shall have a
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 43
■(■MHIHinillHiBI

Page 44
S.B. NO.
^-3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
perfected security interest in all cash and deposit accounts of
the electric utility in which infrastructure resilience property
revenues have been commingled with other funds.
(e) If default occurs under the security agreement
covering the infrastructure resilience property, the pledgees of
the infrastructure resilience property, subject to the terms of
the security agreement, and upon receiving approval from the
commission for a foreclosure request, shall be entitled to
foreclose or otherwise enforce their security interest in the
infrastructure resilience property, subject to the rights of any
third parties holding prior security interests in the
infrastructure resilience property perfected in the manner
provided in this section.
In addition, the commission may require in the financing
order creating the infrastructure resilience property that in
the event of default by the electric utility in payment of
infrastructure resilience property revenues, the commission and
any successor thereto, upon the application by the pledgees or
assignees, including assignees under section -4 of the
infrastructure resilience property, and without limiting any
other remedies available to the pledgees or assignees by reason
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 4

Page 45
S.B. NO. S.,
C.D. 1
of the default, shall order the sequestration and payment to the
pledgees or assignees of infrastructure resilience property
revenues. Any financing order shall remain in full force and
effect notwithstanding any bankruptcy, reorganization, or other
insolvency proceedings with respect to the debtor, pledgor, or
transferor of the infrastructure resilience property. Any
surplus in excess of amounts necessary to pay principal;
premiums, if any; interest, costs, and arrearages on the bonds;
and associated financing costs arising under the security
agreement, shall be remitted to the debtor, pledgor, or
transferor, for the purpose of remitting such amounts to
customers via the electric utility.
(f) Sections 490:9-204 and 490:9-205 shall apply to a
pledge of infrastructure resilience property by the electric
utility, an affiliate of the electric utility, or a financing
entity.
§ -7 Transfers of infrastructure resilience property.
(a) A transfer or assignment of infrastructure resilience
property by the electric utility to an assignee or to a
financing entity, or by an assignee of the electric utility or a
financing entity to another financing entity, which the parties
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 4
niHnniHiiiii

Page 46
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
in the governing documentation have expressly stated to be a
sale or other absolute transfer, in a transaction approved in a
financing order, shall be treated as an absolute transfer of all
of the transferor's right, title, and interest, as in a true
sale, and not as a pledge or other financing, of the
infrastructure resilience property, other than for federal and
state income and franchise tax purposes.
(b) The characterization of the sale, assignment, or
transfer as an absolute transfer and true sale and the
corresponding characterization of the property interest of the
assignee shall not be affected or impaired by, among other
things, the occurrence of any of the following:
(1) Commingling of infrastructure resilience charge
revenues with other amounts;
(2) The retention by the seller of either of the
following:
(A) A partial or residual interest, including an
equity interest, in the financing entity or the
infrastructure resilience property, whether
direct or indirect, subordinate or otherwise; or
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 46
■HiiniMfflMiinffliiin

Page 47 S.B. NO. S.3
C.D. 1
(B) The right to recover costs associated with taxes,
franchise fees, or license fees imposed on the
collection of infrastructure resilience charge;
(3) Any recourse that an assignee may have against the
seller;
(4) Any indemnification rights, obligations, or repurchase
rights made or provided by the seller;
(5) The obligation of the seller to collect infrastructure
resilience charges on behalf of an assignee;
(6) The treatment of the sale, assignment, or transfer for
tax, financial reporting, or other purpose; or
(7) Any true-up adjustment of the infrastructure
resilience charge as provided in the financing order.
(c) A transfer of infrastructure resilience property shall
be deemed perfected against third parties when:
(1) The commission issues the financing order authorizing
the infrastructure resilience charge included in the
infrastructure resilience property; and
(2) An assignment of the infrastructure resilience
property in writing has been executed and delivered to
the assignee.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 4
■iHgiBHiiiiiiHig

Page 48
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(d) As between bona fide assignees of the same right for
value without notice, the assignee first filing a financing
statement with the bureau of conveyances in accordance with
part 5 of article 9 of chapter 490, naming the assignor of the
infrastructure resilience property as debtor and identifying the
infrastructure resilience property, shall have priority. Any
description of the infrastructure resilience property shall be
sufficient if it refers to the financing order creating the
infrastructure resilience property. A copy of the financing
statement shall be filed by the assignee with the commission,
and the commission may require the assignor or the assignee to
make other filings with respect to the transfer in accordance
with procedures the commission may establish; provided that
these filings shall not affect the perfection of the transfer.
§ -8 Financing entity successor requirenents; default of
financing entity. (a) Any successor to an electric utility
subject to a financing order, whether pursuant to any
bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceeding, or
pursuant to any merger, sale, or transfer, by operation of law,
or otherwise, shall be bound by the requirements of this
chapter. The successor of the electric utility shall perform
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 48
IMIHIHIIinilllllllH

Page 49 S.B. NO. 2S.3
C.D. 1
and satisfy all obligations of the electric utility under the
financing order in the same manner and to the same extent as the
electric utility, including the obligation to collect and pay
the infrastructure resilience charge to any financing party as
required by a financing order or any assignee. Any successor to
the electric utility shall be entitled to receive any fixed
recovery tax amounts otherwise payable to the electric utility.
(b) The commission may require in a financing order that,
if a default by the electric utility in remittance of the
infrastructure resilience charge collected arising with respect
to infrastructure resilience property occurs, the commission,
without limiting any other remedies available to any financing
party by reason of the default, shall order the sequestration
and payment to the beneficiaries of the infrastructure
resilience charge collected arising with respect to the
infrastructure resilience property. Any order shall remain in
full force and effect notwithstanding any bankruptcy,
reorganization, or other insolvency proceedings with respect to
the electric utility.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 49
■iiiiiigMiiiWNim

Page 50
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
§ -9 Report to legislature. No later than twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular session, the commission
shall submit a report to the legislature that includes:
(1) An update on its activities under this chapter,
including how the securitization authorized under this
chapter is being utilized; and
(2) Any other findings and recommendations, including any
necessary proposed legislation.
§ -10 Severability. If any provision of this chapter is
held to be invalid or is superseded, replaced, repealed, or
expires for any reason:
(1) That occurrence shall not affect any action allowed
under this chapter that is taken prior to that
occurrence by the commission, a financing entity, a
bondholder, or any financing party, and any such
action shall remain in full force and effect; and
(2) The validity and enforceability of the rest of this
chapter shall remain unaffected."
SECTION 4. Section 269-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 50
IWIHIIMMIWIHIigBlilll

Page 51
S.B. NO.
H.D.2
C.D. 1
”§269-17 Issuance of securities. A public utility
corporation may, on securing the prior approval of the public
utilities commission, and not otherwise, except as provided in
section issue stocks and stock certificates, bonds,
notes, and other evidences of indebtedness, payable at periods
of more than twelve months after the date thereof, for the
following purposes and no other, namely: for the acquisition of
property or for the construction, completion, extension, or
improvement of or addition to its facilities or service, or for
the discharge or lawful refunding of its obligations or for the
reimbursement of moneys actually expended from income or from
any other moneys in its treasury not secured by or obtained from
the issue of its stocks or stock certificates, or bonds, notes,
or other evidences of indebtedness, for any of the [a^ete&a-td]
purposes stated in this section except maintenance of service,
replacements, and substitutions not constituting capital
expenditure in cases where the corporation has kept its accounts
for [such] those expenditures in [ouch] a manner [as to onablo]
that enables the commission to ascertain the amount of moneys so
expended and the purposes for which the expenditures were made,
and the sources of the funds in its treasury applied to the
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 51
iininiiiiiiiiiHiiiiii

Page 52
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
expenditures. As used in yils s^ctior^ "property" and
"facilities"[—] mean property and facilities used in all
operations of a public utility corporation regardless of whether
included in its public utility operations or rate base.
A public utility corporation may not issue securities to acquire
property or to construct, complete, extend or improve or add to
its facilities or service if the commission determines that the
proposed purpose will have a material adverse effect on its
public utility operations.
' All stock and every stock certificate, and every bond,
note, or other evidence of indebtedness of a public utility
corporation not payable within twelve months, issued without an
order of the commission authorizing the same, then in effect,
shall be void."
PART III
SECTION 5. (a) The public utilities commission shall
conduct a study to examine the establishment and implementation
of a wildfire recovery fund to:
(1) Provide efficient compensation for damage resulting
from a future wildfire that was allegedly caused or
exacerbated by an electric utility; and
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx ;
■HIMHHinHni

Page 53
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Help protect the financial integrity of Hawaii's
regulated utilities.
(b) The public utilities commission shall review, examine,
and consider the following:
(1) How a fund would impact utility credit ratings and
costs to customers, including comparing how funds in
other states have performed;
(2) Whether the establishment of a fund is recommended;
(3) If a fund is recommended, a determination of the size
of the wildfire recovery fund, which may include
commissioning of an actuarial study;
(4) If a fund is recommended, a determination of the best
approach to capitalizing the fund and whether moneys
used to capitalize the fund should come from
ratepayers or shareholders, or both;
(5) If a fund is recommended, a determination of the
proper governance of the public corporation that would
oversee the wildfire recovery fund;
(6) If a fund is recommended, a consideration of the
benefits of an administrative process to provide
efficient and low-cost recovery for claimants, and the
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 5
illMliMHHIiWIII

Page 54
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
proper mechanism for providing such an administrative
process; and
(7) A consideration of who can participate in the fund and
if parties other than an electric utility should be
considered for participation.
(c) The public utilities commission shall submit a report
of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed
legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of the regular session of 2026.
PART IV
SECTION 6. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for
consultant contracts.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the public
utilities commission for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 7. There is appropriated out of the public
utilities commission special fund established under section
269-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the sum of $900,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for
consultant contracts for utility dockets.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx :
HMMIIHIHIHIIMI

Page 55 S.B. NO.
^-3
H.D. 2
C.D, 1
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the division of
consumer advocacy for the purposes of this section.
SECTION 8. There is appropriated out of the public
utilities commission special fund established under section
269-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the sum of $300,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for
consultant contracts for utility dockets.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the public
utilities commission for the purposes of this section.
SECTION 9. There is appropriated out of the public
utilities commission special fund established under section
269-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the sum of $900,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for other
current expenses related to the Maui wildfires.
IS The sum appropriated shall be expended by the public
utilities commission for the purposes of this section.
PART V
SECTION 10. In codifying the new sections added by
section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx
■HIHNHIIIIlIillllllll

Page 56
S.B. NO. 2^3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 11. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 12. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
SB897 CDl LRB 25-1835.docx 56
MniiiiiiHMMMOinin]

897
S.B. NO
S.D. 3
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 1st day of July .2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAIM

S.B. No. 897, S.D. 3, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
219

SB No. 897, SD 3, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives